Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 30
FOOD CONTROL

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Food and Drug Act", see part 4 of article 5 of title 25; for the "Colorado Hazardous Substances Act of 1973", see part 5 of article 5 of title 25.

Section

35-30-101. Cooperation with United States.

The governor is authorized to cooperate with the government of the United States and its agents and representatives in all matters pertaining to the conservation, distribution, or production of food, insofar as he may find it possible to do so.

Source:

L. 17:

Ex. Sess., p. 3, § 1.

C.L.

§ 3699.

CSA:

C. 69, § 47.

CRS 53:

§ 7-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-1-1.

35-30-102. Powers of governor.

The governor of the state of Colorado is vested with all police and regulatory powers regarding the production, storage, refrigeration, manufacture, distribution, handling, dealing in, or sale of foodstuffs or food products and other necessities of life, whether in the raw state or in manufactured form, or any article used or capable of use as food for man or beast, which are vested in the president or any other executive officer of the United States; but the rules, regulations, and orders promulgated by the governor in the exercise of the power conferred in this section shall not be more drastic than nor in conflict with the rules, regulations, and orders of the president and executive officers of the United States government.

Source:

L. 17:

Ex. Sess., p. 3, § 2.

C.L.

§ 3700.

CSA:

C. 69, § 48.

CRS 53:

§ 7-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 7-1-2.